Utah statutes.
6-1-13.   Failure to file inventory -- Examination of debtor.

No assignment shall be declared fraudulent or void for want of any list or inventory as provided in this title. The court or judge may, upon application of the assignee or any creditor, compel the appearance in person of the debtor before such court or judge, forthwith or at the next term, to answer under oath such matters as may be inquired of him, and such debtor may be fully examined under oath as to the amount and situation of his estate, and the names of the creditors and amounts due to each with their places of residence, and may be compelled to deliver to the assignee any property or estate embraced in the assignment.



No Change Since 1953

